District of Columbia statutes.
2-1209.01

Purposes.

In enacting this subchapter, the Council of the District of Columbia supports the following statutory purposes:

(1)

To facilitate the establishment of 1 or more business incubators in the District of Columbia by offering the use of city-owned property, credit support for financing businesses in the incubator, and other incentives to ensure that tenant business costs for space and services are kept to a minimum; and

(2)

To design business incubators to assist companies through the conceptual, start-up, and early growth stages of their businesses. The business incubator is not intended to serve merely as inexpensive quarters for established businesses.

History

Dec. 12, 1985, D.C. Law 6-71, § 2, 32 DCR 6334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2231.